Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 1. Qualifications, Selection and Empaneling of Juries
§ 1-11-125.
Procedure when sufficient number of jurors fail to attend.

If a sufficient number of jurors duly selected and notified do not attend to form a jury the court shall direct the clerk to select a sufficient number of names from the base jury list to complete the jury and shall summon the persons selected to attend immediately or at a time fixed by the court. If for any reason a sufficient number of jurors to try the issue is not obtained from the persons notified, the court may make successive orders until a sufficient number is obtained. The court may excuse any juror so selected if it appears that, because of distance, the delay occasioned by summoning the juror and requiring his presence would unduly prolong empaneling the trial jury. Each person so notified, unless excused by the court, shall serve as a juror at the trial. For a neglect or refusal to serve he may be fined in the same manner as a trial juror regularly selected and notified and he is subject to the same exceptions and challenges as any other trial juror.

History:

Laws 1899, ch. 23, § 32; R.S. 1899, § 3371; C.S. 1910, § 1010; C.S. 1920, § 1235; R.S. 1931, § 61-232; C.S. 1945, § 12-133; W.S. 1957, § 1-109; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 1983, ch. 138, § 2; 2014 ch. 53, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Cross references. —

As to exemptions from jury duty, see §

1-11-103

.

As to excuses from jury service, see §

1-11-104

.

As to punishment for failure to attend, see §

1-11-115

.

As to challenges for cause, see §

1-11-203

.

The 2014 amendment,

substituted “selected” for “drawn” or a variant throughout and “of names from the base jury list” for “of ballots from box number one” in the first sentence.

§ 1-11-126.
No objection that jury not original one returned.

It is not a valid objection
to a jury that it contains none of the jurors originally returned
to the court or is only partially composed of such jurors or that
the base jury list was not supplemented as permitted herein.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 23, § 33; R.S. 1899, § 3372; C.S. 1910, § 1011; C.S. 1920, § 1236; R.S. 1931, § 61-233; C.S. 1945, § 12-134; W.S. 1957, § 1-110; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 1983, ch. 138, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to supplementation of base jury list, see §

1-11-106

.

§ 1-11-127.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1899, ch. 23, § 38; R.S. 1899, § 3377; C.S. 1910, § 1013; C.S. 1920, § 1238; R.S. 1931, § 61-235; C.S. 1945, § 12-139; Laws 1955, ch. 22, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 1-111; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 1983, ch. 138, § 2; repealed by 2014 ch. 53, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 1-11-128.
[Repealed.]

History.

Laws 1911, ch. 92, §§ 1, 2; C.S. 1920, § 1247; R.S. 1931, § 61-244; C.S. 1945, § 12-144; W.S. 1957, § 1-116; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; 2010, ch. 34, § 1; repealed by 2014 ch. 53, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 1-11-129.
Procedure for maintaining jury lists.

The supreme court shall compile a base jury list for each county. The supreme court shall compile a base jury list for the state as necessary under W.S.

7-5-303

. The base jury lists shall be compiled from voter lists and may also include names from Wyoming driver’s license or Wyoming department of transportation state identification lists. The base jury lists prepared by the supreme court and panels or lists of prospective jurors selected by the clerk of court may be compiled and maintained using any manual, mechanical, electronic or other means calculated to ensure the integrity of the system and a random selection process.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 138, § 1; 2010, ch. 34, § 1; 2014 ch. 53, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2019 ch. 14, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2010 amendment,

substituted “set by the court” for “modified by the court.”

Laws 2010, ch. 34 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2010.

The 2014 amendment,

rewrote the section which formerly read: “The procedures for compiling and maintaining of jury lists, jury ballots and jury boxes, and for drawing jurors, may be set by the court to permit the compilation and maintenance of jury lists and ballots and for the drawing of jurors by any manual, mechanical, electronic or other means calculated to insure the integrity of the system and a random selection process.”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019,
added “also” and “or Wyoming department of transportation state identification” in the second sentence.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, substituted “ensure the integrity” for “insure the integrity.”

Defendant failed to show that the jury selection process warranted
the granting of his motion to quash the jury panel. —

Defendant's convictions for possession of methamphetamine with intent to deliver were proper because the district court did not err in denying defendant's motion to quash the jury panel; the motion was based upon the district court clerk's policy of selecting jurors from the master list in alphabetical order, rather than in a random selection process. Defendant failed to show that the method used deprived him of a fair cross section of the community or that any distinctive group was systematically excluded from the panel; however, that method was also not to be used in any future cases.
Bloomer v. State, 2009 WY 77, 209 P.3d 574,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 2009).